Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-23] Annual inspections, audits, and
reports. (a) Each medical marijuana production center and dispensary
licensed pursuant to this part shall:

(1) Be subject to an annual announced inspection and
unlimited unannounced inspections of its operations by the department;

(2) Submit reports on at least a quarterly basis, or
as otherwise required, and in the format specified by the department; and

(3) Annually cause an independent financial audit, at
the dispensary licensee's own expense, to be conducted of the dispensary, its
production center, and retail dispensing locations and shall submit the audit's
findings to the department.

(b) The department shall report annually to the
governor and the legislature on the establishment and regulation of medical
marijuana production centers and dispensaries including but not limited to the
number and location of production centers and dispensaries licensed, the total
licensing fees collected, the total amount of taxes collected from production
centers and dispensaries, and any licensing violations determined by the
department. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next